North Carolina, session 2025, HB136.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Chapter 363 of the Private Laws of 1903, as rewritten by
Chapter 159 of the 1961 Session Laws and Chapter 1111 of the 1979 Session Laws, reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 4. Elections in the Town of Faith shall be conducted in accordance with Subchapter IX
of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided by this charter, the election shall be
conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes."
SECTION 2. Section 3 of Chapter 363 of the Private Laws of 1903, as rewritten by
Chapter 159 of the 1961 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the officers of said Town shall consist of five aldermen, who shall elect one of
their number as mayor. be elected to serve a four-year term. From the five aldermen, a mayor
shall be chosen by the aldermen. The mayor and aldermen when qualified as required by law,
may elect a town clerk, a tax collector, a treasurer, such policemen and other officers necessary
to the preservation and regulation of the Town's best interests."
SECTION 3. No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Faith in
2025. The terms of office for the aldermen in the Town of Faith serving on the effective date of
this act shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the
Town of Faith every four years beginning in 2026. In 2026 and quadrennially thereafter, five
aldermen shall be elected to serve four-year terms.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*H136-v-1*